test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_ING_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - k̲íng - ENGLISH : # CLASS_ING_STEM_1

     k̲íng+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲íng
     k̲íng+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íngga
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng
     k̲íng+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲ínggang
     k̲íng+V+DIRECT+PAST: k̲ínggan
     k̲íng+V+RELATIVE: k̲íngs
     k̲íng+V+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íngang
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínggang
     k̲íng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íngganggang
     k̲íng+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínggangang
     k̲íng+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínggiinii
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínggaangaa
     k̲íng+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲ínggaangaan
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íngäsaa
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íngäs
     k̲íng+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íngäsaang
     k̲íng+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íngäsga
     k̲íng+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íngäsaas
     k̲íng+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íngäsaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asa'áa
     k̲íng+V+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asa'áang
     k̲íng+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲íng+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲íng+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'uuj
     k̲íng+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'uujang
     k̲íng+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íngäsaa'uujang
     k̲íng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íng'us
     k̲íng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'ujaa
     k̲íng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'uujaangaa
     k̲íng+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íngäsaa'us
     k̲íng+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íngäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íngäseehl
     k̲íng+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲íng'uu
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'waa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'waa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'waang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íng'wägan
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'aawaa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íng'aawaan
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲íng'waas
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íng'aawaas
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'waa.ang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'aawaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínggang'waa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínggang'waang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínggang'waa.ang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'wägiinii
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'wägaangaa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'wägaangaan
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íng'waaäsaa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íng'waaäs
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íng'waaäsaang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íng'waaäsga
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íng'waaäsaas
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asa'áa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asa'áang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'waa'uuj
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'waa'uujang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íng'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íng'waa'us
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'waa'ujaa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íng'waaäsaa'us
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íng'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íng'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íng'waa'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íng'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲íng'waa'ahl
     k̲íng+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íng'waaäseehl
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: k̲íng'ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'angga
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'anggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íng'anggan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'aangaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íng'aangaan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: k̲íng'ans
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íng'aangaas
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'angang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'aangaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲íng'anggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínggang'anggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínggang'angang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'anggiinii
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'anggaangaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'anggaangaan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íng'angäsaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íng'angäs
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íng'angäsaang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íng'angäsga
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íng'angäsaas
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'angäsaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íngang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'uuj
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'uujang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íng'angäsaa'uujang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'us
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'ang'ujaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'ang'uujaangaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íng'angäsaa'us
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íng'aang'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íng'aang'ahlanggan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'aang'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íng'angäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íng'aang'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íng'aangaa'ahlang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íng'aangaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íng'aangaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: k̲íng'aang'ahl
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íng'angäseehl
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: k̲íng'ang'uu
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: k̲íng'ang'wägan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'ang'aawaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: k̲íng'ang'aawaan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: k̲íng'ang'waas
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: k̲íng'ang'aawaas
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'ang'waa.ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'ang'aawaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínggang'ang'waa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: k̲ínggang'ang'waang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: k̲ínggang'ang'waa.ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'ang'wägiinii
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'ang'wägaangaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'ang'wägaangaan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: k̲íng'ang'waaäs
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: k̲íng'ang'waaäsga
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaas
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaa.ang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: k̲íng'waa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waa'uuj
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waa'uujang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaa'uujang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waa'us
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: k̲íng'ang'waa'ujaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'ang'waa'uujaangaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaa'us
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'waa'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: k̲íng'ang'waa'ahlanggan
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: k̲íng'ang'waa'ahlanggiinii
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: k̲íng'ang'waaäsaa'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: k̲íng'ang'waa'ahlans
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: k̲íng'ang'aawaa'ahlang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: k̲íng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: k̲íng'ang'aawaa'ahlanggang
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: k̲íng'ang'waa'ahl
     k̲íng+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: k̲íng'ang'waaäseehl
